Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-185
Contract to sell for only one manufacturer or wholesaler; void.

No manufacturer or wholesaler shall enter into any contract with any person licensed to sell at retail whereby such licensee agrees not to sell any alcoholic liquor manufactured or distributed by any other manufacturer or wholesaler. Any provision in any contract which violates this section shall render the entire contract void, and no action shall be brought on such contract in any court.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 42, p. 401;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-342;

R.S.1943, § 53-185;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 66.